Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 320.4 of Title 52, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. A surface rights owner shall receive written notice at


least thirty (30) days prior to consideration by the Corporation


Commission of any proposed transfer of operator, lease, or well


interest that affects the surface rights owner’s land.


2. Upon written request, the operator or proposed successor


operator shall provide to the surface owner:



Req. No. 3084 Page 1


a. all due-diligence materials submitted to the


Commission,


b. mechanical integrity reports, environmental


assessments, and well status documentation,


c. estimated plugging and site restoration costs, and


d. financial assurance instruments submitted to the


Commission.


B. Surface owners shall have standing in Commission proceedings


that involve transfer approval, plugging orders, enforcement of due-


diligence duties, and requests for additional financial assurance.


C. 1. A surface owner may file with the Commission:


a. a petition alleging inadequate due diligence,


b. a request to stay a proposed transfer pending


investigation,


c. a request for additional financial assurance, and


d. a complaint alleging a violation of notice or


disclosure requirements.


2. Surface owners may bring an action in civil court for


injunctive relief, actual damages, attorney fees and court costs,


and enforcement of any duty pursuant to this section.


3. No operator or successor may retaliate against a surface


owner for exercising rights pursuant to this section. Retaliation


shall include refusal to communicate, interference with surface


rights, or coercive attempts to deter the owner from filing a

Req. No. 3084 Page 2


petition. Violations of this paragraph are subject to civil


penalties by the Commission.


D. Operators and successor operators shall provide accurate


disclosures, maintain communication with surface owners regarding


major operational changes, cooperate with inspections and site


access necessary for regulatory and legal review, provide timely


response to requests for documentation related to due diligence, and


comply with plugging and site restoration obligations before


dissolution or withdrawal.


E. The Corporation Commission is authorized to investigate any


alleged violation filed by a surface owner and may issue corrective


orders, impose civil penalties, or require additional financial


assurance. The Commission shall provide surface owners with access


to administrative hearing procedures and ensure a timely resolution.


F. This section shall not be construed to limit or preempt the


common law doctrine of nuisance, the provisions of Section 318.1 of


Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or any other remedy available to


surface owners.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3084 CN 1/8/2026 2:08:52 PM







Req. No. 3084 Page 3